Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.270

Procedure on appeal—Certified copy of decision or order.

A certified copy of the decision of the superior court pertaining to assessments for local improvements shall be filed with the officer having custody of the assessment roll and he or she shall modify and correct the assessment roll in accordance with the decision. In the event appellate review of the decision is sought, a certified copy of the court's order shall be filed with the officer having custody of the assessment roll and the officer shall thereupon modify and correct the assessment roll in accordance with the order.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2080; 1988 c 202 s 37; 1971 c 81 s 92; 1965 c 7 s 35.44.270. Prior: 1957 c 143 s 9; prior: 1911 c 98 s 22, part; RRS s 9374, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.